Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska72-259.04
School lands; adjacent to city of the first or second class; annexation; ordinance; contents.

If a majority of all members of the council vote for such annexation, an ordinance shall be prepared and passed by the council declaring the annexation of such territory to the corporate limits of the city and extending the limits thereof accordingly. Such ordinance shall designate the name of the addition and the names of the streets therein.

Laws 1953, c. 259, § 4, p. 869.